Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1136.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 15.99, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the meanings given. (b) "Agency" means a department, agency, board, commission, or other group in the executive branch of state government; a statutory or home rule charter city, county, town, or school district; any metropolitan agency or regional entity; and any other political subdivision of the state. (c) "Request" means a written applicationnew text begin for a building permit or a written applicationnew text end related to zoning, septic systems, watershed district review, soil and water conservation district review, or the expansion of the metropolitan urban service area, for a permit, license, or other governmental approval of an action. A request must be submitted in writing to the agency on an application form provided by the agency, if one exists. The agency may reject as incomplete a request not on a form of the agency if the request does not include information required by the agency. A request not on a form of the agency must clearly identify on the first page the specific permit, license, or other governmental approval being sought. No request shall be deemed made if not in compliance with this paragraph. (d) "Applicant" means a person submitting a request under this section. An applicant may designate a person to act on the applicant's behalf regarding a request under this section and any action taken by or notice given to the applicant's designee related to the request shall be deemed taken by or given to the applicant. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 15.99, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Deadline for response. (a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, section 462.358, subdivision 3b, or 473.175, or chapter 505, and notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, an agency must approve or deny within 60 days a written requestnew text begin for a building permit or a written requestnew text end relating to zoning, septic systems, watershed district review, soil and water conservation district review, or expansion of the metropolitan urban service area for a permit, license, or other governmental approval of an action.new text begin Except as provided in paragraph (b),new text end failure of an agency to deny a request within 60 days is approval of the request. If an agency denies the request, it must state in writing the reasons for the denial at the time that it denies the request. new text begin (b) An agency must approve or deny a building application as expeditiously as possible. Failure of an agency to deny a request for a building permit within 60 days is not an approval of the request. An agency that approves or denies a building permit application more than 60 days from receipt of the application must refund all relevant permitting fees to the applicant within five business days of the date of the decision on the application. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end When a vote on a resolution or properly made motion to approve a request fails for any reason, the failure shall constitute a denial of the request provided that those voting against the motion state on the record the reasons why they oppose the request. A denial of a request because of a failure to approve a resolution or motion does not preclude an immediate submission of a same or similar request. deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end Except as provided in paragraph deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end , if an agency, other than a multimember governing body, denies the request, it must state in writing the reasons for the denial at the time that it denies the request. If a multimember governing body denies a request, it must state the reasons for denial on the record and provide the applicant in writing a statement of the reasons for the denial. If the written statement is not adopted at the same time as the denial, it must be adopted at the next meeting following the denial of the request but before the expiration of the time allowed for making a decision under this section. The written statement must be consistent with the reasons stated in the record at the time of the denial. The written statement must be provided to the applicant upon adoption.